fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-1-wicihew_gt-norm.yaml
     PV/ê+PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-wî-wîcihitân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ê+PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-wî-wîcihitâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-wî-wîcihitâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-wî-wîcihitakok


###FUT+DEF###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     PV/ka+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO:    kika-wîcihin # LOCAL DIR
     PV/ka+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:    kika-wîcihinân
     PV/ka+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO:    kika-wîcihinân
     PV/ka+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO:    kika-wîcihinâwâw

     PV/ka+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:    kika-wîcihitin # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/ka+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO:    kika-wîcihitinân
     PV/ka+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO:    kika-wîcihitinân
     PV/ka+wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO:    kika-wîcihitinâwâw
